Georgia, session 2025_26, SB305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-2-86 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to special license
plates promoting or supporting certain worthy agencies, funds, or nonprofit corporations with
proceeds disbursed to the general fund and the agency, fund, or nonprofit corporation, is
amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (l) to read as follows:
"(71) A special license plate honoring alumni of Alabama State University. The funds
raised by the sale of this special license plate shall be disbursed to the Alabama State
University Metro Atlanta Alumni Chapter."
S. B. 305
- 1 -

LC 39 4703
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(n) of the
Constitution of the State of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the
requisite two-thirds' majority vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 305
- 2 -